Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.030

Community economic revitalization board—Members—Terms—Chair, vice chair—Management services—Travel expenses—Vacancies—Removal.

(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.

(2) The board shall consist of one member from each of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the house and one member from each of the two major caucuses of the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate. The board shall also consist of the following members appointed by the director of commerce: A recognized private or public sector economist; one port district official; one county official; one city official; one representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe; one representative of the public; one representative of small businesses each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area east of Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of the Cascade range and west of the Columbia river, and (d) the area east of the Columbia river; one executive from large businesses each from the area west of the Cascades and the area east of the Cascades. The appointive members shall initially be appointed to terms as follows: Three members for one-year terms, three members for two-year terms, and three members for three-year terms which shall include the chair. Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three years. The chair of the board shall be selected by the director of commerce. The members of the board shall elect one of their members to serve as vice chair. The director of commerce, the director of revenue, the commissioner of employment security, and the secretary of transportation shall serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.

(3) Management services, including fiscal and contract services, shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing this chapter.

(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of appointive members of the board, the director of commerce shall fill the same for the unexpired term. Members of the board may be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges by the director of commerce, under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6) A member appointed by the director of commerce may not be absent from more than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence limitation is deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be replaced by the director of commerce.

(7) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 25; 2008 c 327 s 3; 2004 c 252 s 2; 2003 c 151 s 1; 1996 c 51 s 3; 1995 c 399 s 86; 1993 c 320 s 2. Prior: 1987 c 422 s 2; 1987 c 195 s 11; prior: 1985 c 446 s 2; 1985 c 6 s 13; prior: 1985 c 446 s 1; 1984 c 287 s 89; 1983 1st ex.s. c 60 s 2; 1982 1st ex.s. c 40 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.

Effective date—2008 c 327 s 3: "Section 3 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 1, 2008]." [ 2008 c 327 s 19.]

Severability—Effective dates—1996 c 51: See notes following RCW 43.160.010.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.